District of Columbia statutes.
38-1202.05

Consolidation of existing public institutions of postsecondary education.

The Trustees shall by August 1, 1977, consolidate the existing public institutions of postsecondary education in the District of Columbia under a single management system to be called the University of the District of Columbia, with several programs, schools, colleges, institutes, campuses and other components that offer a comprehensive program of public postsecondary education. The institutions of public postsecondary education in the District of Columbia existing immediately prior to such consolidation shall be deemed abolished on the effective date of the consolidation. Thereafter, any reference in any law, rule, regulation, or other document of the United States or of the District of Columbia to such institutions shall be deemed to be a reference to the University of the District of Columbia.

Oct. 26, 1974, 88 Stat. 1426, Pub. L. 93-471, title II, § 205
Nov. 1, 1975, D.C. Law 1-36, § 4, 22 DCR 2922
Apr. 6, 1977, D.C. Law 1-99, § 2(a), 23 DCR 8729
1973 Ed., § 31-1715.
1981 Ed., § 31-1515.